Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.9c of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Education shall establish guidelines


for school districts in this state to assess the overall fitness of


students and encourage physical activity and healthy habits by


administering the Presidential Fitness Test. The physical fitness


test guidelines shall be based on the recommendations of the


President’s Council on Sports, Fitness, and Nutrition, which was

Req. No. 3120 Page 1


reconstituted by Executive Order 14327. The guidelines shall


include:


1. Training for personnel to administer the test;


2. Exemption guidelines for students with disabilities, medical


conditions, or other factors that would impact their ability to


complete the test; and


3. An option for a parent or legal guardian of a student to opt


the student out of the test.


B. Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, school districts in


this state shall administer the Presidential Fitness Test to


students using the guidelines established pursuant to subsection A


of this section.


C. School districts shall utilize student performance results


on the Presidential Fitness Test to:


1. Promote the physical and mental benefits of daily movement,


exercise, and good nutrition;


2. Modify physical activity opportunities offered to students;


and


3. Encourage participation in physical activities available to


students inside and outside the school setting.


D. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.



Req. No. 3120 Page 2


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3120 EB 1/12/2026 10:04:39 AM





































Req. No. 3120 Page 3